Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3421
License required; use of titles
prohibited.

On
and after January 1, 2013, no individual shall hold himself or herself out
as a genetic counselor unless he or she is licensed in accordance with the
Genetic Counseling Practice Act. An individual who is not so licensed may
not use, in connection with his or her name or place of business, the title
genetic counselor, licensed genetic counselor, gene counselor, genetic consultant,
or genetic associate, or any words, letters, abbreviations, or insignia indicating
or implying that he or she holds a license under the act.

Laws 2012, LB831, § 21.